Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for
the following purposes:
(1) Arts ........................................... $ 4,376,546
(2) Debt service .............................. $ 90,722,590
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are  appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development  Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, for infrastructure, the following amounts  for the following
purposes:
(1) Rivoli theater restoration ......... $ 750,000
(2) Port of Coos Bay navigation
channel...................................... $ 10,000,000
(3) St. Helens waterfront
redevelopment........................... $ 684,000
(4) Municipal building departments
financial assistance grants ....... $ 1,000,000
(5) Sweet Home wastewater
treatment plan upgrade ............ $ 3,500,000
(6) Warm Springs water and
wastewater systems .................. $ 5,737,479
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General  Fund, for business, innovation and trade, the following amounts
for the following purposes:
(1) Emerging Opportunities
Program .................................... $ 13,500,000
(2) Municipal wildfire assistance.... $ 1,000,000
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 1
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 4,253,298
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $245,344,891
(3) Infrastructure ........................... $215,788,458
(4) Arts ........................................... $ 18,228,924
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses by the Oregon Business Development Department, from  American Rescue Plan
Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Business  Development Department,
for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 360,477
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 408,641
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$267,642,183 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Business Development  Department, from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the  Oregon Business Development
Department, for infrastructure, for grants  approved in section 196, chapter 669, Oregon Laws
2021.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses by the Oregon Business  Development Department, from the Broadband Fund
established by section 4, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 380,782
(2) Infrastructure ........................... $106,619,218
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 15,436,848
(2) Business, innovation
and trade...................................  $ 77,456,902
(3) Infrastructure ...........................  $ 4,591,498
(4) Oregon Film and Video Office .. $ 1,479,463
(5) Lottery bond debt service ......... $ 47,504,550
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon  Business Development
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 633,078
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 37,258,810
(3) Infrastructure ........................... $ 57,803,364
(4) Arts ........................................... $ 2,208,982
SECTION 10. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures by the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department are not limited for:
(1) Loans from the following funds:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 2
(a) Oregon Business Development  Fund (ORS 285B.092), Oregon Entrepreneurial Devel-
opment Loan  Fund (ORS 285B.758), Credit Enhancement Fund (ORS 285B.215) and Small
Business Expansion Loan Fund (ORS 285B.133).
(b) Special Public Works Fund (ORS 285B.455), Water Fund (ORS 285B.563), Marine Nav-
igation Improvement Fund  (ORS 777.267), Oregon Port Revolving Fund (ORS 285A.708), Safe
Drinking Water  Revolving Loan Fund (ORS 285A.213), Brownfields Redevelopment Fund (ORS
285A.188) and Oregon Brownfield Properties Revitalization Fund (ORS 285A.198).
(2) Debt service, excluding debt  service on lottery revenue bonds and general obligation
bonds.
SECTION 11. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 3